Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB170.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2723YC (1) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 321E.29B, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. Notwithstanding section 321E.8 , the department may issue 3 annual permits for the operation of vehicles or combinations 4 of vehicles transporting fluid milk products to or from a milk 5 plant, receiving station, or transfer station, exceeding the 6 weight limitation of section 321.463 but not exceeding a gross 7 weight of ninety-six one hundred thirty thousand pounds, on 8 primary roads and primary road extensions in cities. 9 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies on and after 10 the effective date of this Act to fluid milk products annual 11 permits issued on or after that date and to such permits issued 12 prior to that date that are in effect on that date. 13